Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.462

Warren G. Magnuson institute for biomedical research and health professions training—Established.

The Warren G. Magnuson institute for biomedical research and health professions training is established within the Warren G. Magnuson health sciences center at the University of Washington. The institute shall be administered by the university. The institute may be funded through a combination of federal, state, and private funds, including earnings on the endowment fund in RCW 28B.20.472.

[ 1990 c 282 s 1.]